Washington statutes.
RCW 19.118.010

Motor vehicle manufacturers—Express warranties—Service and repair facilities.

Every manufacturer of motor vehicles sold in this state and for which the manufacturer has made an express warranty shall maintain in this state sufficient service and repair facilities reasonably close to all areas in which its motor vehicles are sold to carry out the terms of the warranties or designate and authorize in this state as service and repair facilities independent repair or service facilities reasonably close to all areas in which its motor vehicles are sold to carry out the terms of the warranties. As a means of complying with this section, a manufacturer may enter into warranty service contracts with independent service and repair facilities.

[ 1983 c 240 s 1.]